Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8062.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-21-1, 11-21-2 and 11-21-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-
21 entitled "Hazing" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-21-1. Penalty for hazing.
(a) Any organizer of, or participant in, an activity constituting hazing, as defined in
subsection (b) of this section, § 11-21-4 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction,
shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or punished by imprisonment for not less
than thirty (30) days nor not more than one year, or both.
(b) “Hazing” as used in this chapter, means any conduct or method of initiation into any
student organization, whether on public or private property, which willfully or recklessly endangers
the physical or mental health of any student or other person. This conduct shall include, but not be
limited to, whipping, beating, branding, forced calisthenics, exposure to the weather, forced
consumption of any food, liquor, beverage, drug, or other substance, or any brutal treatment or
forced physical activity which is likely to adversely affect the physical health or safety of the
student or any other person, or which subjects the student or other person to extreme mental stress,
including extended deprivation of sleep or rest or extended isolation.
11-21-2. Penalty for school official permitting hazing.
Every person, being a teacher, principal, superintendent, commandant, coach, athletic
director or other person in charge of any public, private, parochial, or military school, college or
other educational institution, or student organization, who shall knowingly permit any activity

constituting hazing, as defined in § 11-21-1 § 11-21-4 or knowingly or negligently fails to take
reasonable measures within the scope of their authority to prevent hazing, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars
($100) more than one thousand dollars ($1000), or punished by imprisonment for not more than
one year, or both.
11-21-3. Tattooing or permanent disfigurement. Serious bodily injury due to hazing.
Every person being a student, or being a person in attendance at any public, private,
parochial, or military school, college, or other educational institution, who shall tattoo or knowingly
and willfully cause serious injury to any person toward whom an act of hazing is directed
permanently disfigure the body, limbs, or features of any fellow student or person attending the
institution by the use of nitrate of silver or any like substance, or by any other means, shall be held
guilty of a crime of the degree of mayhem, and shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned not exceeding
ten (10) years nor less than one year.
SECTION 2. Chapter 11-21 of the General Laws entitled "Hazing" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following sections:
11-21-4. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Hazing" means any conduct or method of initiation, affiliation, or maintenance of
membership into any student organization, whether on public or private property, which willfully
or recklessly creates a risk, above the reasonable risk encountered in the course of participation in
the institution of higher education or the organization, which endangers the physical or mental
health of any student or other person or willfully or recklessly endangers the physical or mental
health of any student or other person. This conduct shall include, but not be limited to, whipping,
beating, branding, tattooing, forced calisthenics, exposure to the weather, forced consumption of
any food, liquor, beverage, drug, or other substance, or any brutal treatment or forced physical
activity which is likely to adversely affect the physical health or safety of the students or any other
person, or which subjects the student or other person to extreme mental stress, including extended
deprivation of sleep or rest or extended isolation.
(2) "Serious injury" means injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious
physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or
organ or causes significant mental damage or impairment.
(3) "Student" means any person regularly enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis as a
student in an educational institution.
(4) "Student organization" means a fraternity, sorority, association, corporation, order,
LC005603 - Page 2 of 4

society, corps, athletic group, cooperative, club, service, social or similar group, whose members
are or include students, operating at or in conjunction with an educational institution.
11-21-5. Consent.
The implied or express consent of any person toward whom an act of hazing is directed
shall not be a defense in any action brought under this chapter.
11-21-6. Immunity from legal repercussions.
Any person who, in good faith, without malice and in the absence of evidence of an intent
to defraud, seeks medical assistance for someone experiencing physical or mental harm as the direct
result of an act of hazing, shall not be charged or prosecuted for any crime related to hazing as
defined in § 11-21-4.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005603
========
LC005603 - Page 3 of 4